Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-202
Failure to protect; liability for damages.

Any individual or corporation who shall fail to protect such landmarks or corners shall be responsible for all damage that may accrue to the party injured by reason of such loss or destruction.

Laws 1929, c. 129, § 2, p. 479;

C.S.1929, § 34-202;

R.S.1943, § 34-202.